Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-1202
Purpose of act.

The purpose of the Sex Offender Commitment Act is to provide for the court-ordered treatment of sex offenders who have completed their sentences but continue to pose a threat of harm to others. It is the public policy of the State of Nebraska that dangerous sex offenders be encouraged to obtain voluntary treatment. If voluntary treatment is not obtained, such persons shall be subject to involuntary custody and treatment only after mental health board proceedings as provided by the Sex Offender Commitment Act. Such persons shall be subjected to emergency protective custody under limited conditions and for a limited period of time.

Laws 2006, LB 1199, § 58.

The Sex Offender Commitment Act applies specifically to convicted sex offenders who have completed their jail sentences but continue to pose a threat of harm to others. In re Interest of G.H., 279 Neb. 708, 781 N.W.2d 438 (2010).

The Sex Offender Commitment Act is not excessive in relation to its assigned nonpunitive purpose, which is to protect the public and provide treatment to dangerous sex offenders who are likely to reoffend. In re Interest of J.R., 277 Neb. 362, 762 N.W.2d 305 (2009).